California, session 20252026, SB301.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 31566 is added to the Government Code, to read:31566. (a) The Legislature finds and declares that this section is declaratory of existing law.(b) A county or district whose officers and employees are enrolled as members of a retirement system pursuant to this chapter shall not exclude from membership in the system any employee, group, or classification, other than those excludable officers and employees.(c) For purposes of this section, “excludable officers and employees” mean officers and employees whose tenures may be excluded pursuant to Section 31527 as being temporary, seasonal, intermittent, or part time only, as determined by the retirement board, or who are excluded pursuant to Section 31552 or 31553.SEC. 2. The Legislature finds and declares that ensuring consistency for public employees’ membership in county employee retirement systems is a matter of statewide concern and is not a municipal affair as that term is used in Section 5 of Article XI of the California Constitution. Therefore, Section 1 of this act adding Section 31566 to the Government Code applies to all cities and counties, including charter cities and charter counties.